Utah statutes.
26-28-119.   Law governing validity -- Choice of law as to execution of
document of gift -- Presumption of validity.
(1)  A document of gift is valid if executed in accordance with:
(a)  this chapter;
(b)  the laws of the state or country where it was executed; or
(c)  the laws of the state or country where the person making the anatomical
gift was domiciled, has a place of residence, or was a national at the time
the document of gift was executed.
(2)  If a document of gift is valid under this section, the law of this state
governs the interpretation of the document of gift.
(3)  A person may presume that a document of gift or amendment of an
anatomical gift is valid unless that person knows that it was not validly
executed or was revoked.
